Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 150 Fish and Wildlife Resources
150.180.
Buying, selling, or transporting protected wildlife, mussels and fishes, raw fur, or processed wildlife.

Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, and subject to regulations adopted under this chapter, no person, for himself or as the agent or employee of another shall buy, or sell, or attempt to buy, or sell, barter, exchange, or trade, or have in possession for the purpose of selling, bartering, or trading any protected wildlife or part thereof, raw fur or processed wildlife, no matter where or when caught or killed, whether caught or killed in this state or in any other state or other country.

Mussels and fishes, other than sport fishes as designated by departmental regulations, and all fishes, regardless of species, raised by licensed propagation permittees may be bought, sold, and transported, if in legal possession.

Raw furs, if in legal possession, may be sold, transported, or shipped, by a licensed trapper or licensed hunter to a licensed fur buyer (resident or nonresident), and by a licensed fur buyer to a licensed fur processor or to another fur buyer if in legal possession. A fur processor may hold raw furs or sell to another licensed fur processor at any time.

Subject to regulations adopted under this chapter, a person who has been issued a license under this chapter and who has the license on his person may transport anywhere as a part of his personal baggage any protected wildlife legally taken by him under such license, not in excess of the number that the law or regulation permits him to have in possession at any one (1) time.

A person who has legally taken any protected wildlife in another state and who has in his possession the license which authorizes such taking may, if the same be dead, transport the same in this state, as part of his personal baggage at any time during the open season for the particular species in the state in which taken or within ten (10) days after the close of such season. Any person may ship dead game or dead fish so taken subject to the provisions of the laws of the state in which the same was taken and the laws and regulations of the United States relating thereto.

No person shall import or transport into the State of Kentucky or receive shipment in the state from without the state, any live fish or wildlife without first procuring from the department a written fish transportation permit or wildlife transportation permit. If it is determined upon inspection that such fish or wildlife would not constitute a menace to the state and are free from disease and other undesirable physical characteristics, the commissioner shall issue a permit for a fee to be determined by the Fish and Wildlife Commission by administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. A fish transportation permit shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance, and a wildlife transportation permit shall be valid for specific dates as indicated on the permit.

No person may at any time stock any species of fish secured from any source into the public waters of the Commonwealth without first securing a permit from the commissioner.

This section shall not in any way interfere with the transportation of any fish or wildlife by authorized personnel of the department.

Federal and state regulations shall govern the transportation of all migratory wild birds.

History.
1893d-11, 1954d-14: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 18; 1944, ch. 124, § 3; 1946, ch. 84, § 5; 1948, ch. 77, § 4; 1948, ch. 78, § 9; 1952, ch. 200, § 27; 1956, ch. 115, § 12; 1968, ch. 38, § 9; 1978, ch. 178, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 365, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 353, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 127, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

150.183.
Importing, transporting or possessing endangered species of wildlife.

No person shall import, transport, possess for resale or sell any endangered species of wildlife, the hides, skins, or other parts thereof, or any article made in whole or in part from the skin, hide, or other parts of any species of wildlife designated as an endangered species by regulation promulgated by the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. As used in this section, the term “endangered species” means any species of wildlife seriously threatened with worldwide extinction or in danger of being extirpated from the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The regulation or regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include, but not be limited to, all species of wildlife designated as endangered species by the United States Secretary of the Interior on January 1, 1973.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources may permit, under such terms and conditions as it may prescribe, the importation, transportation, possession, or sale of any species of wildlife otherwise prohibited pursuant to this section for zoological, educational, or scientific purposes, and for the propagation of such wildlife in captivity for preservation purposes except as otherwise prohibited by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 40, § 1(1) to (3), effective January 1, 1973; 1978, ch. 384, § 35, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 8, effective July 15, 1986.

150.185.
Rabbits not to be bought or sold. [Repealed.]

150.186.
Release of hog or pig into the wild prohibited — Importing, possessing, or transporting wild or feral pig or boar prohibited — Accidental escape of livestock exempted.

No person shall release a hog or pig from the family Suidae into the wild.

No person shall import, possess, or transport in Kentucky any wild or feral pig, Eurasian or Russian boar, or any hybrid of these, whether born in the wild or captivity.

This section shall not apply to the accidental escape of animals of the porcine species raised as livestock as defined in KRS 246.010.

History.
Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

150.190.
Commercial guide’s license.

Any applicant for a commercial guide’s license shall be required to present proof to the satisfaction of the commissioner, in accordance with regulations the commissioner may prescribe with the approval of the commission, that he is qualified to act as a commercial guide.

Any applicant for a fur processor’s license shall be required to present proof to the satisfaction of the commissioner, in accordance with regulations the commissioner may prescribe with the approval of the commission, that he has sufficient equipment and facilities to engage in the business of processing, manufacture, and storage of raw furs.

A commercial guide’s license shall not be required of residents or nonresidents who are participating in field trials, training exercises, or other competitions where no game is harvested.

History.
1954d-15: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 19; 1946, ch. 84, § 6; 1952, ch. 200, § 28; 1956, ch. 115, § 14; 1958, ch. 166, § 2; 1968, ch. 38, § 10; 1972, ch. 273, § 4; 1978, ch. 178, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 36, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 474, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 239, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 173, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

150.195.
Design, issuance, and distribution of licenses and permits — Administrative regulations.

The department shall by administrative regulation provide for the control of the design, issuance, distribution, and other matters relating to all licenses and permits issued by the department.

The department shall name each county clerk not granted an exemption from selling licenses or permits by the commissioner as an agent for the sale of licenses and permits or other items. The county clerk shall not appoint any other person or organization, other than a paid deputy clerk, to sell licenses and permits. A county clerk may, at any time during his term of office, apply in writing to the commissioner for an exemption from the requirement that he sell licenses and permits or other items for the department. The commissioner shall then grant the exemption until the clerk requests otherwise in writing.

The department shall sell its own licenses or permits and may name any other person or organization meeting the requirements specified by statute and by the department by administrative regulation as an agent for the sale of specified licenses and permits or other items for the department.

The department shall, by administrative regulation, determine:

The number and distribution of agents in a county;

Which licenses and permits or other items shall be sold by the department and agents of the department;

The requirements for persons or organizations, other than county clerks, to sell licenses and permits or other items issued by the department;

The fees allowed to be retained by agents of the department;

Matters relating to the remittance of license and permit fees and proceeds of the sale of other items, procedures for accountability for licenses and permits, and accountability for license and permit fees and proceeds of the sales of other items;

The license and permit term, and the date of expiration of licenses and permits; and

The manner in which the licenses, permits, and other items issued by the department are designed, issued, and sold, and details relating to the application for and sale of licenses, permits, and other items, the reporting of license, permit, and other sales, and other matters deemed necessary by the department for the proper administration and operation of a program relating to the design, issuance, and sale of licenses, permits, and other items issued by the department.

No person shall make a false statement or provide any false information when applying for a license or permit.

Unless permitted to do so by administrative regulation, no person shall alter or modify a license or permit in any manner.

No employee of the department, no agent designated by the department, or no employee of an agent designated by the commissioner shall knowingly make a false entry upon a license or permit, license or permit record, or an application or report required by this chapter or by an administrative regulation issued thereunder.

The department and each agent designated by the commissioner shall keep a correct and complete record of all licenses and permits applied for or issued, and all other records required to be kept by statute or by the department by administrative regulation. License and permit records shall be public records and shall be open to public inspection in the manner provided by KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

No fee for the issuance of a license or permit issued by or on behalf of the department shall be charged or collected by the department or agent of the department other than the amount specified by administrative regulation. Tie-in sales required to obtain a license or permit are prohibited.

The department shall by administrative regulation develop a procedure for suspending or revoking the agent status of a person or organization violating any provision of this chapter, or the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder, relating to the sale, reporting of, or financial accountability for the sale of licenses or permits which the agent is authorized to sell on behalf of the department.

The initial determination to suspend or revoke an agent’s status shall be made by the commissioner, or by his designee; and the agent shall be informed of the decision in writing.

A decision of the commissioner or his designee may be appealed to the commission in writing and received by the department within ten (10) days of receipt of the commissioner’s notice. Hearings of appeals shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Appeals from a final order of the commission shall be to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

Penalties which the commissioner, his designee in writing, or the commission may assess are:

A suspension of the agent’s status for not less than one (1) nor more than five (5) years; or

Revocation of the agent’s status permanently, if a natural person, or for not less than ten (10) years to permanently, if an organization.

Suspension periods shall not be waived, probated, or delayed by the commissioner, his designee in writing, or the commission. The commission or the Franklin Circuit Court, as appropriate, may reduce a suspension period ordered by the commissioner or his designee in writing, but to not less than one (1) year, and may reduce a revocation to a suspension.

The department may experiment with computerized, electronic, or other improved forms of license and permit sales by the department and its agents. Experiments may be conducted on a regional or other basis. The commission shall implement any improved method of license and permit sales finally selected, on a statewide basis by administrative regulation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 239, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 40, effective July 15, 1996.

150.200.
Licenses and forms furnished to county clerk by commissioner. [Repealed.]

150.210.
Printing of licenses and tags — Expense of. [Repealed.]

150.220.
License fees. [Repealed.]

150.221.
Duplicate license or tag when original lost or destroyed. [Repealed.]

150.225.
Prescription of license, permit, and registration fees — Fiduciary capacity of person who collects, receives, possesses, or manages fees.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall, by its commission and through administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, prescribe reasonable fees for the licenses, permits, and registrations authorized by KRS Chapters 150 and 235.

A person who collects, receives, possesses, or manages fees for the department’s licenses and permits acts in a fiduciary capacity for the Commonwealth, and all moneys collected from the sale of licenses and permits, except agent fees for selling licenses or permits, shall be held in trust for the department.

History.
Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 166, § 3, effective June 19, 1958; 1988, ch. 365, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 275, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

150.230.
Fees for issuance of licenses and tags. [Repealed.]

150.235.
License or permit required — To be carried on person — Nonresidents — Effect of revocation or suspension of license or permit.

No person shall perform any act authorized to be performed by any of the various licenses or permits provided for in this chapter without first procuring the type of license which authorizes the performance of the act and unless at the time of the performance of the act he has the license on his person, except that in the case of a fur processor it shall be sufficient if the license is posted in a conspicuous place upon the licensed premises.

Wherever in this chapter reference is made to the “holder” of a license, or permit, it means the person in whose name the license or permit was issued. No person to whom a license or permit has been issued under this chapter may authorize or permit any other person to carry his license or permit. No person shall present the license of another person for inspection.

No nonresident shall perform any act under this chapter without first procuring the proper nonresident license or permit.

No person who has had his privilege to perform an act authorized under this chapter revoked or suspended shall possess the kind of license or permit that would otherwise permit the act for the period of the suspension.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 9; 1948, ch. 77, § 6; 1952, ch. 200, § 33; 1968, ch. 38, § 11; 1978, ch. 178, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 365, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 239, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

150.236.
Effect of revocation or suspension of license by another jurisdiction in United States or Canada.

A person whose privilege to hunt or fish has been suspended or revoked by any jurisdiction within the United States or Canada shall not purchase or possess a license to hunt or fish, nor shall that person perform any act permitted by the license in Kentucky during the period of suspension or revocation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 275, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

150.237.
Short term nonresident hunting license. [Repealed.]

150.238.
Reciprocal agreements with other states relating to violations of hunting and fishing laws — Administrative regulations.

The department may enter into reciprocal agreements with one (1) or more states relating to violations of hunting and fishing laws. Upon entering into such an agreement, the department shall promulgate an administrative regulation adopting the provisions of the agreement and incorporating the entire document by reference.

The department may, pursuant to a reciprocal agreement and administrative regulation authorized by subsection (1) of this section, deny, suspend, revoke, or reinstate:

A hunting, fishing, or trapping license; or

A privilege, in the case of an individual who is license-exempt.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

150.240.
Contract for game refuge — Public or commercial shooting areas.

The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, may contract with any landowner of the state, for a specified term of years, to set aside and maintain land as a game refuge. Any such contracts may be recorded in the county clerk’s office of the county in which the land is situated.

The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, may issue permits for public or commercial shooting areas, and shall adopt regulations governing same.

History.
1954d-30: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 24; 1944, ch. 6, § 5; 1952, ch. 200, § 34; 1978, ch. 384, § 289, effective June 17, 1978.

150.250.
Contract for wildlife preservation or propagation.

The department, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the consent of the Governor, may enter into any contract with the United States government, or any department or agency thereof, or with any individual in regard to the preservation, protection and propagation of wildlife which it may deem to the advantage of the state to enter into.

History.
1954d-37: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 25; 1952, ch. 200, § 35; 1986, ch. 265, § 10, effective July 15, 1986.

150.255.
Wetland or stream compensatory mitigation projects — Mitigation fund — Purposes.

Upon request of any state agency or any other entity, the department may contract with the agency or party to undertake any compensatory mitigation project, including, but not limited to, wetland or stream mitigation.

The department may establish and manage wetland or stream compensatory mitigation banks, the purpose of which shall be to restore, create, or enhance wetlands and streams as compensatory mitigation where a state agency or other party is required to provide compensatory mitigation, and where the use of banked mitigation is approved by the agency requiring mitigation. The department may create the bank in advance of requests for banked mitigation credits.

There is established and created in the State Treasury the “Kentucky Wetland and Stream Mitigation Fund” for the purpose of restoring, creating, enhancing, or preserving the Commonwealth’s wetlands or streams that may be damaged or destroyed due to any project, recovering costs associated with performing these projects, and administering these programs. The fund shall be deemed a trust and agency fund account and made available solely for the purposes and benefits of the Kentucky wetland and stream mitigation projects. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, revolving funds, and any other funds both public and private. Money deposited in the fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the request of the commissioner with the approval of the commission. Any unallocated or unencumbered balance in the fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9), and any income earned from the investments, along with the unallocated or unencumbered balance in the fund, shall not lapse.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 284, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

150.260.
Wildlife restoration in cooperation with federal government.

Kentucky assents to the provisions of acts of Congress which provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife restoration projects, and for other purposes, as approved September 2, 1937, and August 9, 1950, as well as other acts related to wildlife. The department shall supervise and/or carry out such programs as may be necessary to the establishment and conduct of cooperative wildlife restoration projects in compliance with said acts and with rules and regulations promulgated thereunder by the Secretary of the Interior or other secretaries dealing with matters related to wildlife. No game and fish funds accruing to the department shall be diverted to any objective other than the purposes as outlined in this chapter and more particularly defined in KRS 150.015.

History.
1954d-35: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 26; 1952, ch. 200, § 36; 1968, ch. 38, § 12.

150.265.
Cooperation with Federal Government in fish restoration and management projects; no diversion of license fees. [Repealed.]

150.270.
Consent to acquisition by United States of migratory bird reservations.

Kentucky consents to the acquisition by the United States by purchase, gift, devise or lease of such areas in Kentucky as the United States may deem necessary for the establishment of migratory bird reservations in accordance with the Migratory Bird Conservation Act, approved February 18, 1929 (45 Stat. 1222).

Kentucky reserves complete jurisdiction and authority in and over all such areas not incompatible with the administration, maintenance, protection, and control thereof by the United States under the terms of Acts of Congress. This section shall in no wise deprive the courts of Kentucky of jurisdiction to try and punish all violations of any of the criminal or penal statutes of Kentucky in such areas.

History.
1954d-36: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 27; 1952, ch. 200, § 37.

150.275.
Permit to take and transport wildlife for commercial nuisance wildlife control, scientific, or educational purposes — Fees to be set by administrative regulation.

The commissioner may issue to any qualified person a permit to take and transport wildlife at any time for commercial nuisance wildlife control, scientific, or educational purposes; such permits shall be valid at the discretion of the commissioner and shall show upon their face the period of their validity.

The Fish and Wildlife Commission may set fees, by administrative regulation pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, for the issuance of permits authorized by subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 10; 1952, ch. 200, § 38; 1978, ch. 178, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 353, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

150.280.
Propagation and holding of protected wildlife — Permits — Revocation for violation of state or federal law.

Except as provided by administrative regulation, a person shall not propagate or hold protected wildlife without obtaining a permit to do so from the department. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations governing all such activity and prescribing permit fees. Any permit issued pursuant to this section may be revoked for a violation by the holder thereof of any of the provisions of this chapter, any administrative regulation of the department, or hunting, fishing, or wildlife laws of the federal government.

The department shall by administrative regulation identify species of wildlife potentially damaging to native ecosystems and shall prohibit the transporting or holding of these wildlife.

History.
1954d-31: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 28; 1948, ch. 78, § 14; 1952, ch. 200, § 39; 1968, ch. 38, § 13; 1978, ch. 178, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 353, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 512, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

150.290.
Sale and transportation of wildlife by breeders.

Any breeder may sell and transport wildlife alive for propagation, and for food purposes, or minnows for bait, during seasons prescribed by the commission. Such wildlife shall be identified either by marking their container or by individual tagging, as the commissioner may prescribe.

No breeder shall sell wildlife procured from other than a licensed propagation farm.

History.
1954d-32, 1954d-33: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 29; 1952, ch. 200, § 40; 1978, ch. 178, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 12, effective July 15, 1986.

150.300.
Poaching — Destroying or defacing signs and notices.

No person shall, without first securing the permission of the commissioner, enter upon the premises of a propagation farm, game farm or game refuge, or fish hatchery and take wildlife; or, without the consent of the property owner, enter upon any pond and take wildlife or foul the waters of any pond or farm with a substance injurious to life or growth of wildlife, or break or destroy any dam, reservoir, or embankment or divert the waters or otherwise willfully damage the farm or pond.

It is unlawful for any person to mar, deface, destroy or in any wise damage, or attempt to mar, deface, destroy or damage any sign or posted notice upon any game farm, game or wildlife refuge or fish hatchery in the state.

History.
1954d-34: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 30; 1952, ch. 200, § 41; 1986, ch. 265, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 35, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

150.305.
Possession of wildlife or raw fur out of season — Inspection of commercial frozen food lockers.

Subject to regulations adopted under this chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall have in his possession any wildlife protected by this chapter, or any raw fur, except during the open season for the particular species, unless such person be the holder of a valid permit issued pursuant to the provisions of KRS 150.275 or 150.280.

Any person who has legally taken any wildlife may possess same in cold storage. If possessed in a commercial locker plant, the name of the taker, his license number, the date of taking, and the number and species of wildlife must be marked on the package in which the same is stored. Legally imported wildlife from other states or countries may be similarly held.

Federal regulations shall govern the possession of migratory wild birds.

To facilitate the enforcement of subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner, or such agents and employees of the department as may be designated by him, shall have authority to inspect all commercial frozen food lockers within the State of Kentucky at such periods and intervals as the commissioner shall, in the exercise of a reasonable discretion, fix and determine. No search warrant or other legal process shall be required of any properly authorized person as a condition precedent to the making of the inspections herein authorized.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 11; 1948, ch. 78, § 15; 1952, ch. 200, § 42; 1968, ch. 38, § 14; 1986, ch. 265, § 14, effective July 15, 1986.

150.310.
Birds to be taken only with bow and arrow or certain type gun; plugging of gun; lights prohibited. [Repealed.]

150.320.
Birds not protected — Nests and eggs.

No person shall take any wild bird except game birds or live raptors for which there is an open season, either under the laws of Kentucky and the regulations of the department or the laws of the United States, except those birds mentioned in subsection (2) of this section.

This chapter does not protect or in any way limit the taking of the starling or the English sparrow, but any persons taking any of them must have a hunting license.

No person shall take, disturb, or destroy the nest or eggs of any wild birds except for raptors as prescribed by regulation.

History.
1954d-53: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 32; 1948, ch. 78, § 16; 1952, ch. 200, § 44; 1968, ch. 38, § 15; 1978, ch. 178, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 2006, ch. 127, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

150.330.
Migratory birds — Waterfowl.

No person shall take, pursue, possess, transport, purchase or sell or attempt to do so, any migratory birds, except as authorized by the Migratory Bird Treaty Act (40 Stat. 755) as amended and regulations under it.

No person sixteen (16) years of age or older shall hunt any waterfowl unless, at the time, in addition to the appropriate state hunting license and current migratory bird/waterfowl permit, he has on his person a valid migratory bird hunting stamp of current issue as required by the Migratory Bird Hunting Stamp Act (48 Stat. 451) as amended.

History.
1954d-54: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 33; 1944, ch. 124, § 6; 1946, ch. 84, § 13; 1948, ch. 78, § 17; 1952, ch. 200, § 45; 1964, ch. 143, § 1; 1968, ch. 38, § 16; 1988, ch. 365, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 2019 ch. 115, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

150.340.
Bag and creel limits — Limit on possession — Migratory birds.

No person shall take more wildlife in any one (1) day than the bag or creel limit prescribed for the species by the department.

A person who has hunted two (2) or more days in succession may transport as personal baggage a total of not more than three (3) times the bag limit as set by the regulations for any one (1) day.

Federal and state regulations shall apply to all migratory birds and waterfowl.

History.
1954d-55: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 34; 1944, ch. 124, § 7; 1946, ch. 84, § 32; 1948, ch. 78, § 18; 1952, ch. 200, § 46; 1960, ch. 125; 1968, ch. 38, § 17; 2019 ch. 115, § 6, effective June 27, 2019.

150.350.
Bird dogs not to run at large, when. [Repealed.]

150.355.
Ferrets.

No person shall use ferrets in hunting. No person shall keep a ferret which was born in the wild as a pet or for any purpose, unless he has procured a ferret permit from the commissioner. A permit must be obtained within ten (10) days after the person acquires possession of a ferret and one (1) permit shall entitle the holder to keep any number of ferrets. If the owner of any ferret uses it contrary to the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may revoke his permit and confiscate all of his ferrets. Each use of a ferret in hunting shall constitute a separate offense.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a ferret which has been born and raised in captivity nor to a ferret born and raised in captivity which was obtained from a pet store or private vendor. Except for the prohibition on using a ferret for hunting, no permit shall be necessary to keep a ferret which was born and raised in captivity and a ferret born and raised in captivity shall be exempt from regulation under this chapter or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

History.
Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 36; 1952, ch. 200, § 47, effective June 19, 1952; 1998, ch. 356, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

150.360.
Restrictions on taking of wildlife — Discharge of weapon across public roadway prohibited.

No person shall take any wildlife, whether protected by this chapter or not, except by trapping, snaring, gig, crossbow, bow and arrow, hook and line, nets, gun, gun and dog, dog, falconry, or as expressly prescribed by regulation.

Shotguns used in the taking of wildlife, protected or unprotected, shall not be larger than 10-gauge and shall be fired from the shoulder. No wildlife, except deer or light geese during a light geese conservation order, protected or unprotected, shall be taken with or by means of any automatic loading or hand-operated repeating shotgun capable of holding more than three (3) shells, the magazine of which has not been cut off or plugged with a one (1) piece filler incapable of removal through the loading end, in such manner as to reduce the capacity of the gun to not more than three (3) shells at one (1) time in the magazine and chamber combined.

No person shall take or attempt to take any wildlife, protected or unprotected, from an automobile, or other vehicle, unless prescribed by regulation. Boats may be used except as prohibited by state or federal regulation.

No person shall discharge any firearm, bow and arrow, crossbow or other similar device, upon, over, or across any public roadway.

No person shall take wildlife, except opossum, raccoon, fishes and frogs, with lights or other means designed to make wildlife visible at night.

Coyotes may be taken at night with or without the use of lights or other means designed to make wildlife visible at night, as established by administrative regulation.

History.
1954d-56, 1954d-60: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 37; 1944, ch. 124, § 9; 1946, ch. 84, § 14; 1952, ch. 200, § 48; 1968, ch. 38, § 18; 1978, ch. 178, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 15, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 474, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2013, ch. 29, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 115, § 7, effective June 27, 2019.

150.361.
Taking game with a firearm during bow season prohibited.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall knowingly take game with a firearm during bow season.

This section shall not apply to a person who:

Uses a firearm permitted by law to take game permitted by law to be taken during bow season; or

Kills, attempts to kill, wounds, or attempts to wound an animal in self-defense, in defense of another person, or in defense of property, or as provided in KRS 150.172.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

150.362.
Prohibition against taking wildlife by person under influence of alcohol or controlled substance.

A person shall not take or attempt to take wildlife with a firearm, bow, or crossbow, if the person is manifestly under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance, and the person:

May endanger himself or herself or other persons or property; or

Is engaging in any behavior specified in subsection (1)(a) to (d) of KRS 525.060.

A peace officer may arrest a person for violating subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 168, effective July 15, 1998.

150.363.
Computer-assisted remote hunting unlawful — Citizens with disabilities.

For purposes of this section, “computer-assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or any other device, equipment, or software to remotely control the aiming and discharge of a rifle, shotgun, handgun, bow and arrow, crossbow, or any other implement to hunt or harvest wildlife in the Commonwealth.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt or harvest wildlife in the Commonwealth by means of computer-assisted remote hunting.

It shall be unlawful for any person to provide or operate a facility that allows others to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting of wildlife in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit or prohibit the hunting rights or privileges provided to citizens with disabilities pursuant to KRS 150.025, the Americans with Disabilities Act, and Kentucky administrative regulations. Additionally, this section shall not be construed to prohibit a person who is physically impaired, to the degree that he or she cannot operate a device allowed for taking of game under Kentucky law, from taking game, subject to administrative regulations, with a device which is in the immediate vicinity of the permittee and which the permittee operates using remote-control technology other than the Internet.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

150.365.
Fire, explosives, electric devices, gas, smoke to take wildlife prohibited.

No wildlife may be taken as the result of a fire, or any type of explosive, or with the aid of any mechanical, electric or hand operated sonic recording devices, except as specified by regulation. No person shall use smoke or gas or in any other way molest or destroy the den, hole or nest of any wildlife, nor shall any person burn a field for the purpose of driving game, except employees or agents of the department in carrying out investigational, research or improvement projects.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 15; 1952, ch. 200, § 49; 1956, ch. 115, § 16; 1968, ch. 38, § 19; 1972, ch. 273, § 5; 1986, ch. 265, § 16, effective July 15, 1986.

150.370.
Open season for wildlife — Exceptions.

No person shall take any wildlife except during the open season for the particular species as prescribed by the department.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to persons who hunt red fox at night with dogs for sport and not to kill; and who during daylight or night hours exercise and train rabbit dogs, raccoon dogs, bird dogs, and retrievers, but not to kill. The department may, however:

Regulate training seasons for rabbit dogs, raccoon dogs, bird dogs, and retrievers in such manner as not to discriminate against one (1) type of animal over any other nor as to unduly limit such activities; and

Permit rabbit dog, raccoon dog, bird dog, fox dog, and retriever meets held by organized clubs, regardless of any hunting season, with the prior approval of the department provided said approval was requested at least thirty (30) days prior to the meet.

History.
1954d-57, 1954d-58, 1954d-70: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 38; 1944, ch. 124, § 10; 1946, ch. 84, § 16; 1948, ch. 78, § 19; 1952, ch. 200, § 50; 1964, ch. 143, § 2; 1968, ch. 38, § 20; 1972, ch. 273, § 6; 1978, ch. 178, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 17, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 127, § 6, effective July 12, 2006.

150.380.
Bag limits of animals; limits on possession. [Repealed.]

150.390.
Restrictions on hunting wild elk, deer, wild turkey, or bear — Depredation permits — Administrative regulations — Methods to reduce deer and elk populations that threaten agriculture or health and human safety.

No person shall possess, take, pursue, or attempt to take or pursue or otherwise molest any wild elk, deer, wild turkey, or bear in any manner contrary to any provisions of this chapter or its regulations.

No person shall use a dog to chase or molest wild elk or deer in any manner, at any time, or at any place. Any conservation officer, peace officer, sheriff, or constable may take necessary steps to stop, prevent, or bring under control any dog or dogs found chasing or molesting wild elk or deer at any time.

The department shall establish by administrative regulation the conditions under which depredation permits may be issued without cost to persons suffering damage from wild elk to allow the taking of wild elk.

If Kentucky’s wild elk population reaches a level that will sustain limited hunting, the department may establish by administrative regulations the conditions and permits that would allow the controlled taking of wild elk.

The department shall identify areas where deer and elk pose a significant threat to agriculture or to health and human safety from automobile accidents and may take necessary steps to reduce the deer and elk population in those areas. Methods to reduce the deer and elk population may include but are not limited to the following:

Special hunts;

Increasing the doe harvest; and

Working with the Transportation Cabinet to make vegetation along highways unpalatable to deer and elk.

HISTORY:
1954d-61: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 40; 1952, ch. 200, § 52; 1956, ch. 115, § 17; 1968, ch. 38, § 21; 1978, ch. 181, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 365, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 474, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 24, § 1, effective March 4, 1998; 2017 ch. 124, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.